Tennessee, session 114, SB0219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131(b)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(i) If the child is found to be delinquent for a second delinquent act, the court
may enter an order of restitution against the parent, legal custodian, or guardian who
had custody of the child at the time of the act for the expenses incurred by any law
enforcement agency in responding to and investigating the delinquent act.
(ii) If the child is found to be delinquent for a third or subsequent delinquent act,
the court shall enter an order of restitution against the parent, legal custodian, or
guardian who had custody of the child at the time of the act for the expenses incurred by
any law enforcement agency in responding to and investigating the delinquent act.
(iii) A restitution order entered under this subdivision (b)(1)(B) must be no less
than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), if the act committed by the child would be a
misdemeanor if committed by an adult, or no less than five hundred dollars ($500), if the
act committed by the child would be a felony if committed by an adult. A restitution order
entered under this subdivision (b)(1)(B) must not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).
If the court finds that the child's parent, legal custodian, or guardian is indigent and
waives restitution under this subdivision (b)(1)(B), then the court must order the child's
parent, legal custodian, or guardian to perform community service work in lieu of the
restitution.
SB0219
000524
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000524